Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.711

Director may terminate receivership—Expenses.

If at any time after a receiver is appointed, the director determines that all material deficiencies at the credit union have been corrected, and that the credit union is in a safe and sound condition to resume conducting business, the director may terminate the receivership and permit the credit union to reopen upon such terms and conditions as the director may prescribe. Before being permitted to reopen, the credit union must pay all of the expenses of the receiver.

[ 1997 c 397 s 82.]